New Jersey, session 222, A121.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 42 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 42 Natural Resource Management STATE AID 21-4895  Natural Resources Engineering ............................. $500,000 Total State Aid appropriation, Natural Resources Management.......................... $500,000 State Aid: 21    Peckman River Dredging and Restoration Project................................................................ ($500,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Peckman River Dredging and Restoration Project shall be allocated to the Township of Cedar Grove, the Township of Little Falls, the Township of Verona, and the Borough of Woodland Park, pursuant to an application process established by the Commissioner of Environmental Protection, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The Peckman River Dredging and Restoration Project shall include the dredging, restoration, cleaning, desnagging, and any other purpose or activity consistent with the Statewide general permit issued for the dredging and restoration of the Peckman River, and provided for in the municipalities joint plan submitted to the commissioner.  The municipalities shall file a joint application on a form prescribed by the commissioner, which application shall include such information as the commissioner may deem necessary to determine the amount of funding allocated to each applicant, including, but not limited to, the municipalities joint plan for the dredging and restoration of the Peckman River.  The Department of Environmental Protection shall waive any permit fee for any activity consistent with the Statewide general permit issued for the dredging and restoration of the Peckman River, and provided for in the municipalities joint plan submitted to the commissioner. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.